Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.630

Graduate fellowship trust fund program—Moneys not subject to collective bargaining.

Any private or public money, including all investment income, deposited in the Washington graduate fellowship trust fund or any local endowment for fellowship programs shall not be subject to collective bargaining.

[ 1987 c 147 s 7. Formerly RCW 28B.10.886.]